Georgia statutes. 
(b) The matters with which the planning department or agency shall be required to make such investigation and recommendation shall be:

(1) Whether the zoning proposal will permit a use that is suitable in view of the use of adjacent or nearby property within 3,000 feet of a military base, military installation, or military airport;

(2) Whether the zoning proposal will adversely affect the existing use or usability of nearby property within 3,000 feet of a military base, military installation, or military airport;

(3) Whether the property to be affected by the zoning proposal has a reasonable economic use as currently zoned;

(4) Whether the zoning proposal will result in a use which will or could cause a safety concern with respect to excessive or burdensome use of existing streets, transportation facilities, utilities, or schools due to the use of nearby property as a military base, military installation, or military airport;

(5) If the local government has an adopted land use plan, whether the zoning proposal is in conformity with the policy and intent of the land use plan; and

(6) Whether there are other existing or changing conditions affecting the use of the nearby property as a military base, military installation, or military airport which give supporting grounds for either approval or disapproval of the zoning proposal.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-66-6, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 581, § 1.)

——————————

CHAPTER 66A

TRANSFER OF DEVELOPMENT RIGHTS

Sec.

36-66A-1. Definitions.

36-66A-2. Procedures, methods, and standards for transfer of development rights.

Annotations

Law reviews. - For annual survey article on local government law, see 50 Mercer L. Rev. 263 (1998).

36-66A-1. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this chapter, the term:

(1) "Development rights" means the development that would be allowed on the sending property under any comprehensive or specific plan or local zoning ordinance of a municipality or county in effect on the date the municipality or county adopts an ordinance pursuant to this chapter. Development rights may be calculated and allocated in accordance with factors including dwelling units, area, floor area, floor area ratio, height limitations, traffic generation, or any other criteria that will quantify a value for the development rights in a manner that will carry out the objectives of this Code section.

(2) "Person" means any natural person, corporation, partnership, trust, foundation, nonprofit agency, or other legal entity.

(3) "Receiving area" means an area identified by an ordinance as an area authorized to receive development rights transferred from a sending area.

(4) "Receiving property" means a lot or parcel within which development rights are increased pursuant to a transfer of development rights. Receiving property shall be appropriate and suitable for development and shall be sufficient to accommodate the transferable development rights of the sending property without substantial adverse environmental, economic, or social impact to the receiving property or to neighboring property.

(5) "Sending area" means an area identified by an ordinance as an area from which development rights are authorized to be transferred to a receiving area.

(6) "Sending property" means a lot or parcel with special characteristics, including farm land; woodland; desert land; mountain land; a flood plain; natural habitats; wetlands; ground-water recharge area; marsh hammocks; recreation areas or parkland, including golf course areas; or land that has unique esthetic, architectural, or historic value that a municipality or county desires to protect from future development.

(7) "Transfer of development rights" means the process by which development rights from a sending property are affixed to one or more receiving properties.

(8) "Transfer ratio" means the ratio of the number of development rights that may be allocated to and transferred from a lot or parcel in a sending area to the number of development credits that may be allocated to and used upon a lot or parcel in a receiving area.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-66A-1, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1678, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1219, § 2; Ga. L. 2003, p. 859, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 1029, § 1/HB 1160; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 36/HB 942.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2008, p. 1029, § 3/HB 1160, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall apply to transfers of development rights executed on or after July 1, 2008.

Law reviews. - For article, "Local Government Law," see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 389 (2001).

For note on the 2003 amendment to this Code section, see 20 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 192 (2003).

36-66A-2. Procedures, methods, and standards for transfer of development rights.

Statute text

(a) Pursuant to the provisions of this Code section, the governing body of any municipality or county by ordinance may, in order to conserve and promote the public health, safety, and general welfare, establish procedures, methods, and standards for the transfer of development rights within its jurisdiction.

(b) Any proposed transfer of development rights shall be subject to the approval and consent of the property owners of both the sending and receiving property.

(c) Prior to any transfer of development rights, a municipality or county shall adopt an ordinance providing for:

(1) The issuance and recordation of the instruments necessary to sever development rights from the sending property and to affix development rights to the receiving property. These instruments shall be executed by the affected property owners and lienholders and recorded in the county superior court clerk's office and in a separate registry maintained by the municipal or county governing authority;

(2) The preservation of the character of the sending property and assurance that the prohibitions against the use and development of the sending property shall bind the landowner and every successor in interest to the landowner;

(3) The severance of transferable development rights from the sending property and the delayed transfer of development rights to a receiving property, which may include the transfer of development rights in accordance with any transfer ratio established by the local government for sending areas, receiving areas, or both;

(4) The purchase, sale, exchange, or other conveyance of transferable development rights prior to the rights being affixed to a receiving property;

(5) A system for monitoring the severance, ownership, assignment, and transfer of transferable development rights;

(6) The right of a municipality or county to purchase development rights and to hold them for conservation purposes or resale;

(7) The right of a person to purchase development rights and to hold them for conservation purposes or resale;

(8) Development rights made transferable pursuant to this Code section shall be interests in real property and shall be considered as such for purposes of conveyancing and taxation. Once a deed of transferable development rights created pursuant to this Code section has been sold, conveyed, or otherwise transferred by the owner of the parcel from which the development rights were derived, the transfer of development rights shall vest in the grantee and become freely alienable. For the purposes of ad valorem real property taxation, the value of a transferable development right shall be deemed appurtenant to the sending property until the transferable development right is registered as a distinct interest in real property with the appropriate tax assessor or the transferable development right is used at a receiving property and becomes appurtenant thereto;

(9) A map or other description of areas designated as sending and receiving areas for the transfer of development rights between properties; and

(10) Such other provisions as the municipality or county deems necessary to aid in the implementation of the provisions of this chapter.

(d) (1) Prior to the enactment of an ordinance as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, the local governing authority shall provide for a hearing on the proposed ordinance. At least 15 but not more than 45 days prior to the date of the hearing, the local governing authority shall cause to be published in a newspaper of general circulation within the territorial boundaries of the political subdivision a notice of the hearing. The notice shall state the time, place, and purpose of the hearing.

(2) Prior to any changes in an area designated in an ordinance as a sending or receiving area, the local governing authority shall provide for notice and a hearing as provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection.

(e) Proposed transfers of development rights shall become effective upon the recording of the conveyance with the appropriate deed-recording authorities and the filing of a certified copy of such recording with the local governing authority of each political subdivision in which a sending or receiving area is located in whole or in part.

(f) Municipalities and counties which are jointly affected by development are authorized to enter into intergovernmental agreements for the purpose of enacting interdependent ordinances providing for the transfer of development rights between or among such jurisdictions, provided that such agreements otherwise comply with applicable laws. Any ordinances enacted pursuant to this subsection may provide for additional notice and hearing and signage requirements applicable to properties within the sending and receiving areas in each participating political subdivision.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-66A-2, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1678, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1219, § 3; Ga. L. 2003, p. 859, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 1029, § 2/HB 1160; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 36/HB 942.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2008, p. 1029, § 3/HB 1160, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall apply to transfers of development rights executed on or after July 1, 2008.

Law reviews. - For article, "Local Government Law," see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 389 (2001).

For note on the 2003 amendment to this Code section, see 20 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 192 (2003).

——————————

CHAPTER 66B

MOBILE BROADBAND INFRASTRUCTURE LEADS TO DEVELOPMENT

Sec.

36-66B-1. Short title.

36-66B-2. Legislative findings and intent.

36-66B-3. Definitions.

36-66B-4. Streamlined processing.

36-66B-5. Time limitations for review of application for new wireless facilities or support structure.

36-66B-6. Limitations on local regulations.

36-66B-7. Limitations on local fees charged.

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article on the 2014 amendment of this chapter, see 31 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 149 (2014).

36-66B-1. Short title.

Statute text

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Mobile Broadband Infrastructure Leads to Development (BILD) Act."

History

(Code 1981, § 36-66B-1, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 328, § 1/SB 432; Ga. L. 2014, p. 413, § 1/HB 176.)

36-66B-2. Legislative findings and intent.

Statute text

(a) The General Assembly finds that the enactment of this chapter is necessary to:

(1) Ensure the safe and efficient integration of facilities necessary for the provision of broadband and other advanced wireless communication services throughout this state;

(2) Ensure the ready availability of reliable wireless communication services to the public to support personal communications, economic development, and the general welfare;

(3) Encourage where feasible the modification or collocation of wireless facilities on existing wireless support structures over the construction of new wireless support structures in the deployment or expansion of commercial wireless networks; and

(4) Allow the deployment of critical wireless infrastructure to ensure that first responders can provide for the health and safety of all residents of Georgia.

(b) While recognizing and confirming the purview of local governments to exercise zoning, land use, and permitting authority within their territorial boundaries with regard to the location, construction, and modification of wireless communication facilities, it is the intent of this chapter to establish procedural standards for the exercise of such authority so as to streamline and facilitate the construction, collocation, or modification of such facilities, including the placement of new or additional wireless facilities on existing wireless support structures. It is not the intent of this chapter to limit or preempt the scope of a local government's review of zoning, land use, or permitting applications for the siting of wireless facilities or wireless support structures or to require a local government to exercise its zoning power.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-66B-2, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 328, § 1/SB 432; Ga. L. 2014, p. 413, § 1/HB 176.)

36-66B-3. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this chapter, the term:

(1) "Accessory equipment" means any equipment serving or being used in conjunction with a wireless facility or wireless support structure and includes, but is not limited to, utility or transmission equipment, power supplies, generators, batteries, cables, equipment buildings, cabinets, and storage sheds, shelters, or similar structures.

(2) "Antenna" means communications equipment that transmits, receives, or transmits and receives electromagnetic radio signals used in the provision of all types of wireless communication services.

(3) "Application" means a formal request submitted to the local governing authority to construct, collocate, or modify a wireless support structure or a wireless facility.

(4) "Collocate" or "collocation" means the placement or installation of new wireless facilities on previously approved and constructed wireless support structures, including monopoles and towers, both self-supporting and guyed, in a manner that negates the need to construct a new freestanding wireless support structure. Such term includes the placement of accessory equipment within an existing equipment compound.

(5) "Complete application" means an application containing all documents, information, and fees specifically enumerated in or required by the local governing authority's regulations, ordinances, and forms pertaining to the location, construction, collocation, modification, or operation of wireless facilities.

(6) "Equipment compound" means an area surrounding or adjacent to the base of a wireless support structure within which accessory equipment is located.

(7) "Local governing authority" means a municipality or county that has adopted land use or zoning regulations for all or the majority of land uses within its jurisdiction or has adopted separate regulations pertaining to the location, construction, collocation, modification, or operation of wireless facilities.

(8) "Modification" or "modify" means the improvement, upgrade, expansion, or replacement of existing wireless facilities on an existing wireless support structure or within an existing equipment compound, provided such improvement, upgrade, expansion, or replacement does not increase the height of the wireless support structure or increase the dimensions of the equipment compound.

(9) "Registry" means any official list, record, or register maintained by a local governing authority of wireless facilities, equipment compounds, or wireless support structures.

(10) "Utility" means any person, corporation, municipality, county, or other entity, or department thereof or entity related or subordinate thereto, providing retail or wholesale electric, data, cable, or telecommunications services.

(11) "Wireless facility" means the set of equipment and network components, exclusive of the underlying wireless support structure, including antennas, transmitters, receivers, base stations, power supplies, cabling, and accessory equipment, used to provide wireless data and wireless telecommunication services.

(12) "Wireless support structure" means a freestanding structure, such as a monopole, tower, either guyed or self-supporting, or suitable existing or alternative structure designed to support or capable of supporting wireless facilities. Such term shall not include any telephone or electrical utility pole or any tower used for the distribution or transmission of electrical service.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-66B-3, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 328, § 1/SB 432; Ga. L. 2014, p. 413, § 1/HB 176.)

36-66B-4. Streamlined processing.

Statute text

(a) Applications for collocation or modification of a wireless facility entitled to streamlined processing under this Code section shall be reviewed for conformance with applicable site plan and building permit requirements, including zoning and land use conformity, but shall not otherwise be subject to the issuance of additional zoning, land use, or special use permit approvals beyond the initial zoning, land use, or special permit approvals issued for such wireless support structure or wireless facility. The intent of this Code section is to allow previously approved wireless support structures and wireless facilities to be modified or collocations thereto to be accepted without additional zoning or land use review beyond that which is typically required by the local governing authority for the issuance of building or electrical permits.

(b) The streamlined process set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section shall apply to applications for proposed modifications and to applications for proposed collocations that meet the following requirements:

(1) The proposed modification or collocation shall not increase the overall height or width of the wireless support structure to which the wireless facilities are to be attached;

(2) The proposed modification or collocation shall not increase the dimensions of the equipment compound initially approved by the local governing authority;

(3) The proposed modification or collocation shall comply with applicable conditions of approval, if any, applied to the initial wireless facilities and wireless support structure, as well as any subsequently adopted amendments to such conditions of approval; and

(4) The proposed modification or collocation shall not exceed the applicable weight limits for the wireless support structure, as demonstrated by a letter from a structural engineer licensed to practice in this state.

(c) A local governing authority's review of an application to modify or collocate wireless facilities on an existing wireless support structure shall not include an evaluation of the technical, business, or service characteristics of such proposed wireless facilities. A local governing authority shall not require an applicant to submit radio frequency analyses or any other documentation intended to demonstrate the proposed service characteristics of the proposed wireless facilities, to illustrate the need for such wireless facilities, or to justify the business decision to collocate such wireless facilities; provided, however, that the local governing authority may require the applicant to provide a letter from a radio frequency engineer certifying the applicant's proposed wireless facilities will not interfere with public safety emergency communications.

(d) Within 90 calendar days of the date an application for modification or collocation of wireless facilities is filed with the local governing authority, unless another date is specified in a written agreement between the local governing authority and the applicant, the local governing authority shall:

(1) Make its final decision to approve or disapprove the application; and

(2) Advise the applicant in writing of its final decision.

(e) Within 30 calendar days of the date an application for modification or collocation is filed with the local governing authority, the local governing authority shall determine if it is a complete application and, if it determines the application is not a complete application, notify the applicant in writing of any information required to complete such application. To the extent additional information is required to complete the application, the time required by the applicant to provide such information shall not be counted toward the 90 calendar day review period set forth in subsection (d) of this Code section. Information requested to complete the application may only include the documents, information, and fees specifically enumerated in the local governing authority's regulations, ordinances, and forms pertaining to the location, construction, collocation, modification, or operation of wireless facilities.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-66B-4, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 328, § 1/SB 432; Ga. L. 2014, p. 413, § 1/HB 176.)

36-66B-5. Time limitations for review of application for new wireless facilities or support structure.

Statute text

(a) Within 150 calendar days of the date an application for a new wireless support structure is filed with the local governing authority, unless another date is specified in a written agreement between the local governing authority and the applicant, the local governing authority shall:

(1) Make its final decision to approve or disapprove the application; and

(2) Advise the applicant in writing of its final decision.

(b) Within 30 calendar days of the date an application for a new wireless support structure is filed with the local governing authority, the local governing authority shall determine if it is a complete application and, if it determines the application is not a complete application, notify the applicant in writing of any information required to complete such application. To the extent additional information is required to complete the application, the time required by the applicant to provide such information shall not be counted toward the calendar day review period set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section. Information requested to complete the application may only include the documents, information, and fees specifically enumerated in the local governing authority's existing regulations, ordinances, and forms pertaining to the location, construction, collocation, modification, or operation of wireless facilities.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-66B-5, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 413, § 1/HB 176.)

36-66B-6. Limitations on local regulations.

Statute text

In the regulation of the placement or construction of any new wireless facility or wireless support structure, a local governing authority shall not:

(1) Condition the approval of any application for a new wireless support structure on a requirement that a modification or collocation to such structure be subject to a review that is inconsistent with the requirements of Code Section 36-66B-4;

(2) Require the removal of existing wireless support structures or wireless facilities as a condition to approval of an application for a new wireless facility or wireless support structure unless such existing wireless support structure or wireless facility is abandoned and owned by the applicant; or

(3) Require the applicant to place an antenna or other wireless communications equipment on publicly owned land or on a publicly or privately owned water tank, building, or electric transmission tower as an alternative to the location proposed by the applicant.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-66B-6, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 413, § 1/HB 176.)

36-66B-7. Limitations on local fees charged.

Statute text

A local governing authority shall not:

(1) Charge an applicant a zoning, permitting, or other fee for review or inspection of a new or existing wireless facility or wireless support structure in an amount greater than the amount authorized by subsection (a) of Code Section 48-13-9;

(2) Charge an applicant a zoning, permitting, or other fee for review or inspection of a collocation or modification in excess of $500.00;

(3) Seek reimbursement from the applicant for any application fees, consultation fees, registry fees, or audit fees with respect to a wireless facility or wireless support structure that are based on a contingency fee arrangement; or

(4) Charge a wireless service provider or wireless infrastructure provider any rental, license, or other fees in excess of the fair market value for rental or use of similarly situated property to renew or extend the term of a lease or other agreement for a wireless facility or wireless support structure on such local governing authority's property.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-66B-7, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 413, § 1/HB 176.)

——————————

CHAPTER 66C

STREAMLINING WIRELESS FACILITIES AND ANTENNAS

Sec.

36-66C-1. Short title.

36-66C-2. Definitions.

36-66C-3. Informing authority on deployment of small wireless facilities and poles; confidentiality and proprietary nature of information.

36-66C-4. Collocation of small wireless facilities and installation, modification, or replacement of associated poles or decorative poles.

36-66C-5. Fees and rates preceding collocation; annual increases; rate changes after changes in federal law; removal; penalty.

36-66C-6. Administrative review; public availability of accepted applications; requirements for application; exception to permitting requirements; changes to application information; exclusive arrangements prohibited; neutrality; location within right of way.

36-66C-7. Requirements of authority following receipt of application; notification of time lapse; consolidated application; limitation on installation locations and permits; reconditioning work; time restrictions; imminent risk to public safety; repair of damage; delivery of notice or decision.

36-66C-8. Compliance with all applicable law.

36-66C-9. Due care during installation and maintenance; interference prohibited.

36-66C-10. Collocation within historic district; limitations.

36-66C-11. Alternate locations; certification.

36-66C-12. Requirements for use of decorative poles.

36-66C-13. Consolidated applications.

36-66C-14. Resolution of conflicting requests.

36-66C-15. Indemnification and liability.

36-66C-16. Extra services.

36-66C-17. Application if prior agreement in place.

36-66C-18. Limitations.

36-66C-19. Conflicting provisions.

36-66C-20. Wireline backhaul facilities not addressed; no communication services authorized; utilization of rights of ways.

36-66C-21. No relief of duties.

Annotations

Effective date. - This chapter became effective October 1, 2019; however, Code Sections 36-66C-1, 36-66C-2, and 36-66C-3 became effective April 26, 2019.

36-66C-1. Short title.

Statute text

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Streamlining Wireless Facilities and Antennas Act."

History

(Code 1981, § 36-66C-1, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 236, § 1/SB 66.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - For information as to the effective date of this Code section, see the effective date note at the beginning of this chapter.

36-66C-2. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this chapter, the term:

(1) "Administrative review" means review by an authority, including authority staff, of an application to determine whether the issuance of a permit is in conformity with the applicable provisions of this chapter.

(2) "Antenna" means:

(A) Communications equipment that transmits, receives, or transmits and receives electromagnetic radio frequency signals used in the provision of wireless services or other wireless communications; or

(B) Communications equipment similar to equipment described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph used for the transmission, reception, or transmission and reception of surface waves.

Such term shall not include television broadcast antennas, antennas designed for amateur radio use, or satellite dishes for residential or household purposes.

(3) "Applicable codes" means uniform building, fire, safety, electrical, plumbing, or mechanical codes adopted by a recognized national code organization to the extent such codes have been adopted by the state or an authority or are otherwise applicable in the jurisdiction in which the application is submitted.

(4) "Applicant" means any person that submits an application.

(5) "Application" means a written request submitted by an applicant to an authority for a permit to:

(A) Collocate a small wireless facility in a right of way; or

(B) Install, modify, or replace a pole or decorative pole in a right of way on which a small wireless facility is or will be collocated.

(6) "Authority" means any county, consolidated government, or municipality or any agency, district, subdivision, or instrumentality thereof. Such term shall not include an electric supplier.

(7) "Authority pole" means a pole owned, managed, or operated by or on behalf of an authority. Such term shall not include poles, support structures, electric transmission structures, or equipment of any type owned by an electric supplier.

(8) "Class I Authority" means any county which has 100,000 parcels or more of real property within the unincorporated area of such county, any consolidated government which has 100,000 parcels or more of real property within the consolidated area, or any municipality which has 100,000 parcels or more of real property within the municipality.

(9) "Class II Authority" means any county which has at least 10,000 parcels but less than 100,000 parcels of real property within the unincorporated area of such county, any consolidated government which has at least 10,000 parcels but less than 100,000 parcels of real property within the consolidated area, or any municipality which has at least 10,000 parcels but less than 100,000 parcels of real property within the municipality.

(10) "Class III Authority" means any county which has less than 10,000 parcels of real property within the unincorporated area of such county, any consolidated government which has less than 10,000 parcels of real property within the consolidated area, or any municipality which has less than 10,000 parcels of real property within the municipality.

(11) "Collocate" or "collocation" means to install, mount, modify, or replace a small wireless facility on or adjacent to a pole, decorative pole, or support structure.

(12) "Communications facility" means the set of equipment and network components, including wires and cables and associated equipment and network components, used by a communications service provider to provide communications services.

(13) "Communications service provider" means a provider of communications services.

(14) "Communications services" means cable service as defined in 47 U.S.C. Section 522(6); telecommunications service as defined in 47 U.S.C. Section 153(53); information service as defined in 47 U.S.C. Section 153(24), as each such term existed on January 1, 2019; or wireless services.

(15) "Consolidated application" means an application for the collocation of multiple small wireless facilities on existing poles or support structures or for the installation, modification, or replacement of multiple poles and the collocation of associated small wireless facilities.

(16) "Decorative pole" means an authority pole that is specially designed and placed for aesthetic purposes.

(16.1) "Electric supplier" shall have the same meaning as provided in Code Section 46-3-3.

(17) "Eligible facilities request" means an eligible facilities request as set forth in 47 C.F.R. Section 1.40001(b) (3), as it existed on January 1, 2019.

(18) "FCC" means the Federal Communications Commission of the United States.

(19) "Fee" means a one-time, nonrecurring charge based on time and expense.

(20) "Historic district" means:

(A) Any district, site, building, structure, or object included in, or eligible for inclusion in, the National Register of Historic Places maintained by the secretary of the interior of the United States in accordance with Section VI.D.1.a.i-v of the Nationwide Programmatic Agreement codified by 47 C.F.R. Part 1;

(B) Any area designated as a historic district under Article 2 of Chapter 10 of Title 44, the "Georgia Historic Preservation Act"; or

(C) Any area designated as a historic district or property by law prior to April 26, 2019.

(21) "Law" means and includes any and all federal, state, or local laws, statutes, common laws, codes, rules, regulations, orders, or ordinances.

(22) "Metropolitan statistical area" means a standard metropolitan statistical area which is located within this state and recognized by the United States Department of Commerce, Bureau of the Census, according to the United States decennial census of 2010 or any future such census.

(23) "Micro wireless facility" means a small wireless facility not larger in dimension than 24 inches in length, 15 inches in width, and 12 inches in height that has an exterior antenna, if any, no longer than 11 inches.

(24) "Permit" means a written authorization, in electronic or hard copy format, required to be issued by an authority to initiate, continue, or complete the collocation of a small wireless facility or the installation, modification, or replacement of a pole or decorative pole upon which a small wireless facility is collocated.

(25) "Person" means an individual, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association, trust, or other entity or organization, including an authority.

(26) "Pole" means a vertical pole such as a utility, lighting, traffic, or similar pole made of wood, concrete, metal, or other material that is lawfully located or to be located within a right of way, including without limitation a replacement pole and an authority pole. Such term shall not include a support structure, decorative pole, or electric transmission structure.

(27) "Rate" means a recurring charge.

(28) "Reconditioning work" means the activities associated with substantially painting, reconditioning, improving, or repairing authority poles.

(29) "Replace," "replacement," or "replacing" means to replace a pole or decorative pole with a new pole or a new decorative pole, similar in design, size, and scale to the existing pole or decorative pole consistent with 47 C.F.R. 1.40001(b)(7) as it existed on January 1, 2019, in order to address limitations of, or change requirements applicable to, the existing pole to structurally support the collocation of a small wireless facility.

(30) "Replacement work" means the activities associated with replacing an authority pole.

(31) "Right of way" has the same meaning as provided in paragraph (25) of Code Section 32-1-3; provided, however, that such term shall apply only to property or an interest therein that is under the ownership or control of an authority and shall not include property or any interest therein acquired for or devoted to an interstate highway or the public rights, structures, sidewalks, facilities, and appurtenances described in subparagraph (K) or (R) of paragraph (24) of Code Section 32-1-3.

(32) "Small wireless facility" means radio transceivers; surface wave couplers; antennas; coaxial, fiber optic, or other cabling; power supply; backup batteries; and comparable and associated equipment, regardless of technological configuration, at a fixed location or fixed locations that enable communication or surface wave communication between user equipment and a communications network and that meet both of the following qualifications:

(A) Each wireless provider's antenna could fit within an enclosure of no more than six cubic feet in volume; and

(B) All other wireless equipment associated with the facility is cumulatively no more than 28 cubic feet in volume, measured based upon the exterior dimensions of height by width by depth of any enclosure that may be used. The following types of associated ancillary equipment are not included in the calculation of the volume of all other wireless equipment associated with any such facility:

(i) Electric meters;

(ii) Concealment elements;

(iii) Telecommunications demarcation boxes;

(iv) Grounding equipment;

(v) Power transfer switches;

(vi) Cut-off switches; and

(vii) Vertical cable runs for connection of power and other services.

Such term shall not include a pole, decorative pole, or support structure on, under, or within which the equipment is located or collocated or to which the equipment is attached and shall not include any wireline backhaul facilities or coaxial, fiber optic, or other cabling that is between small wireless facilities, poles, decorative poles, or support structures or that is not otherwise immediately adjacent to or directly associated with a particular antenna.

(33) "State" means the State of Georgia.

(34) "Support structure" means a building, billboard, water tank, or any other structure to which a small wireless facility is or may be attached. Such term shall not include a decorative pole, electric transmission structure, or pole.

(35) "Wireless infrastructure provider" means any person, including a person authorized to provide telecommunications services in this state, that builds, installs, or operates small wireless facilities, poles, decorative poles, or support structures on which small wireless facilities are or are intended to be used for collocation but that is not a wireless services provider.

(36) "Wireless provider" means a wireless infrastructure provider or a wireless services provider.

(37) "Wireless services" means any services provided to the public using licensed or unlicensed spectrum, including the use of Wi-Fi, whether at a fixed location or mobile.

(38) "Wireless services provider" means a person that provides wireless services.

(39) "Wireline backhaul facility" means an aboveground or underground wireline facility used to transport communications data from a telecommunications demarcation box associated with small wireless facility to a network.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-66C-2, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 236, § 1/SB 66.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2019, "April 26, 2019" was substituted for "the effective date of this Code section" at the end of subparagraph (20)(C).

Editor's notes. - For information as to the effective date of this Code section, see the effective date note at the beginning of this chapter.

36-66C-3. Informing authority on deployment of small wireless facilities and poles; confidentiality and proprietary nature of information.

Statute text

(a) An applicant that has not previously held a meeting with a Class I Authority that complies with this Code section shall meet with the Class I Authority at least 30 days before submitting applications under Code Section 36-66C-6 to inform such authority in good faith when such applicant expects to commence deployment of small wireless facilities and poles within such authority pursuant to this chapter, the number of small wireless facilities and poles it expects to deploy during the 24 months after commencement, and the expected timing of such deployments.

(b) Upon request by any Class II Authority that is located within a metropolitan statistical area and with which the applicant has not previously held a meeting that complies with this Code section, an applicant shall meet with such authority at least 30 days before submitting applications under Code Section 36-66C-6 to inform such authority in good faith when such applicant expects to commence deployment of small wireless facilities and poles within such authority pursuant to this chapter, the number of small wireless facilities and poles it expects to deploy during the 24 months after commencement, and the expected timing of such deployments.
